Alabama, session 2026rs, HB45.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
32 Section 1. Sections 17-11-4 and 17-11-9, Code of
33 Alabama 1975, are amended to read as follows:
34 "§17-11-4
35 (a) The application required in Section 17-11-3 shall
36 be in a form prescribed and designed by the Secretary of State
37 and shall be used throughout the state. The application form
38 shall contain and require all of the following:
39 (1) That the applicant submit sufficient information to
40 identify the applicant.
41 (2) The applicant's name, residence address, and such
42 other information as necessary to verify that the applicant is
43 a registered voter.
44 (3) A list of all felonies of moral turpitude, as
45 provided in Section 17-3-30.1, and a requirement that the
46 applicant declaredeclaration that he or shethe applicant is
47 not barred from voting because of a disqualifying felony
48 conviction or, if the applicant was convicted of a
49 disqualifying felony, that the applicant's right to vote has
50 been restored.
51 (4) An explanation of penalties for violations of this
52 section.
53 (b)(1) Any applicant may receive assistance in filling
54 out the application as he or she desires, but each application
55 shall be manually signed by the applicant, under penalty of
56 perjury, and if he or she signs by mark, the application shall
Page 2

perjury, and if he or she signs by mark, the application shall
HB45 INTRODUCED
57 also include the name of the witness and the witness's
58 signature.
59 (2) It shall be unlawful for any person to knowingly
60 distribute an absentee ballot application to a voter which is
61 prefilled with the voter's name or any other information
62 required on the application form.
63 (c)(1) Completed applications may be submitted to the
64 absentee election manager in any of the following ways, as
65 further provided by rule of the Secretary of State:
66 a. The applicant delivering the application in person.
67 b. The applicant mailing the application by U.S. mail.
68 c. The applicant sending the application by commercial
69 carrier.
70 d. The applicant's designee delivering the application
71 in person for any applicant who has a disability or who
72 requires emergency treatment by a licensed physician within
73 five days before an election pursuant to Section 17-11-3. For
74 purposes of this paragraph, "disability" means a physical or
75 mental impairment that substantially limits one or more major
76 life activities of the applicant.
77 (2) Except in situations governed by paragraph (1)d. or
78 Section 17-11-3(f), it shall be unlawful for an individual to
79 submit a completed absentee ballot application to the absentee
80 election manager other than his or her own application, except
81 that an application for a voter who requires emergency
82 treatment by a licensed physician within five days before an
83 election pursuant to Section 17-11-3 may be submitted to the
84 absentee election manager by an individual designated by the
Page 3

absentee election manager by an individual designated by the
HB45 INTRODUCED
85 applicant.
86 (d)(1) Except in situations governed by Section
87 17-11-3(f), it shall be unlawful for a third party to
88 knowingly receive a payment or gift for distributing,
89 ordering, requesting, collecting, completing, prefilling,
90 obtaining, or delivering a voter's absentee ballot
91 application. Any person who violates this subdivision shall be
92 guilty of a Class C felony.
93 (2) Except in situations governed by Section
94 17-11-3(f), it shall be unlawful for a person to knowingly pay
95 or provide a gift to a third party to distribute, order,
96 request, collect, prefill, complete, obtain, or deliver a
97 voter's absentee ballot application. Any person who violates
98 this subdivision shall be guilty of a Class B felony.
99 (e) Any voter who requires assistance to vote by reason
100 of blindness, disability, or inability to read or write may be
101 given assistance by an individual of the voter's choice, other
102 than the voter's employer or agent of that employer or officer
103 or agent of the voter's union.
104 (f) Voters voting by absentee ballot through the
105 Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act are not
106 subject to this section. The Secretary of State shall provide
107 applications for absentee voting to military and overseas
108 voters in accordance with Section 17-4-35."
109 "§17-11-9
110 (a)(1) Each prospective absentee voter who meets the
111 requirements of this article shall be furnished with the
112 absentee ballot herein provided for, together with two three
Page 4

absentee ballot herein provided for, together with two three
HB45 INTRODUCED
113 envelopes for returning his or her marked ballot and
114 instructions for completing and returning the absentee ballot
115 as well as instructions for correcting mistakes in completing
116 ballots or obtaining a replacement ballot.
117 One(2) The first envelope shall be a plainsecrecy
118 envelope in which the ballot shall be sealed by the voter
119 after he or she has marked it.
120 (3) The second envelope shall be an affidavit envelope.
121 The affidavit envelope shall have the voter's affidavit
122 printed on the back and shall be large enough to seal the
123 plain ballot envelope inside.
124 (4) The secondthird envelope shall also be a return
125 mail envelope. SuchThe return mail envelope shall be addressed
126 on the front to the absentee election manager and shall be
127 endorsed on the left-hand upper corner thereof as follows:
128 "Absent Voter's Ballot. State, County, Municipal,
129 General, Primary, or Special Election (as the case may be) to
130 be held on the ___ day of ____, 2__ From ______ (name of
131 voter), precinct or districts _________, County of _______,
132 Alabama."
133 (b)(1) After marking the ballot and subscribing the
134 oath herein required, the voter shall: (i) seal his or her
135 ballot in the plainsecrecy envelope,; (ii) place that plainthe
136 secrecy envelope inside the affidavit envelope,; (iii)
137 complete the affidavit, and have a notary public (or other
138 officer authorized to acknowledge oaths) or two
139 witnessesindividuals witness his or her signature to the
140 affidavit, and forward it by United States; (iv) place the
Page 5

affidavit, and forward it by United States; (iv) place the
HB45 INTRODUCED
141 affidavit envelope inside the return mail envelope; and (v)
142 hand deliver the return mail envelope to the absentee election
143 manager or send the return mail envelope by U.S. mail or by
144 commercial carrier to the absentee election manager or hand it
145 to him or her in person.
146 (2) Notwithstanding subdivision (1), a voter who has a
147 disability may have his or her designee hand deliver the
148 return mail envelope to the absentee election manager or send
149 the return mail envelope by U.S. mail or by commercial
150 carrier. For purposes of this subdivision, "disability" means
151 a physical or mental impairment that substantially limits one
152 or more major life activities of the voter.
153 (c)(1) Notwithstanding the other provisions of this
154 section, the absentee election manager shall determine whether
155 an applicant for an absentee ballot is obligated to produce
156 identification in accordance with Sections 17-9-30 and 17-10-1
157 or reidentify in accordance with Chapter 4. For absentee
158 applicants required to produce identification, a thirdan
159 additional envelope of different color and sufficient size to
160 enclose the first and secondsecrecy and affidavit envelopes
161 shall be provided to the applicant along with instructions for
162 including a proper form of identification in accordance with
163 Sections 17-9-30 and 17-10-1.
164 (2) For absentee applicants required to reidentify
165 because they do not appear in the voting place for which they
166 seek to vote but do appear in another voting place within the
167 state voter registration list, the absentee election manager
168 shall provide to the voter a thirdan additional envelope of
Page 6

shall provide to the voter a thirdan additional envelope of
HB45 INTRODUCED
169 different color and sufficient size to enclose the first and
170 secondsecrecy and affidavit envelopes along with a voter
171 reidentification form, a provisional voter affirmation, and
172 instructions in accordance with Section 17-10-2. SuchThe
173 ballot shall be treated as a provisional ballot and the term
174 "Provisional" shall be marked on the second or affidavit
175 envelope prior to transmitting the ballot to the voter.
176 (3) Applicants for an absentee ballot who do not appear
177 on the state voter registration list shall not be entitled to
178 an absentee ballot."
179 Section 2. This act shall become effective immediately
180 upon its passage and approval by the Governor, or its
181 otherwise becoming law.
Page 7